New York, session 2025-2026, S9034.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph h of subdivision 2 of section 355 of the educa- 2 tion law is amended by adding a new subparagraph 12 to read as follows: 3 (12) (i) Beginning in the two thousand twenty-six--two thousand twen- 4 ty-seven academic year, all current and future mandatory university 5 fees, with the exclusion of the graduate student association student 6 activity fee, shall be charged to a state university of New York gradu- 7 ate student serving a full-time or half-time appointment as a graduate 8 teaching assistant, graduate assistant, graduate research assistant, 9 graduate research associate, or graduate teaching associate at the rate 10 of twenty-five percent of all mandatory university fees, with the exclu- 11 sion of the graduate student association student activity fee. 12 (ii) Beginning in the two thousand twenty-seven--two thousand twenty- 13 eight academic year and thereafter, no mandatory university fees shall 14 be charged to those serving as a full-time or half-time graduate teach- 15 ing assistant, graduate assistant, graduate research assistant, graduate 16 research associate or graduate teaching associate, with the exclusion of 17 the graduate student association student activity fee. 18 § 2. Section 6206 of the education law is amended by adding a new 19 subdivision 25 to read as follows: 20 25. a. Beginning in the two thousand twenty-six--two thousand twenty- 21 seven academic year, all current and future mandatory university fees, 22 with the exclusion of the graduate student association student activity EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07787-05-6 S. 9034--B 2 1 fee, shall be charged to a city university of New York graduate student 2 serving as a graduate assistant, adjunct instructor, adjunct lecturer, 3 adjunct college laboratory technician or a non-teaching adjunct staff 4 member at the rate of twenty-five percent of all mandatory university 5 fees, with the exclusion of the graduate student association student 6 activity fee. 7 b. Beginning in the two thousand twenty-seven--two thousand twenty- 8 eight academic year and thereafter, no mandatory university fees shall 9 be charged to those serving as a graduate assistant, adjunct instructor, 10 adjunct lecturer, adjunct college laboratory technician or a non-teach- 11 ing adjunct staff member, with the exclusion of the graduate student 12 association student activity fee. 13 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.